Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.735

Ground emergency medical transportation services—Medicaid reimbursement—Intergovernmental transfer program—Federal approval—Authority's duties.

(1) The authority shall design and implement, in consultation with eligible providers as described in subsection (2) of this section, an intergovernmental transfer program relating to medicaid managed care, ground emergency medical transport services including those services provided by emergency medical technicians at the basic, advanced, and paramedic levels in the prestabilization and preparation for transport in order to increase capitation payments for the purpose of increasing reimbursement to eligible providers.

(2) A provider is eligible for increased reimbursement pursuant to this section only if the provider meets both of the following conditions in an applicable state fiscal year:

(a) Provides ground emergency medical transport services to medicaid managed care enrollees pursuant to a contract or other arrangement with a medicaid managed care plan.

(b) Is owned or operated by the state, a city, county, fire protection district, special district, community services district, health care district, federally recognized Indian tribe or unit of government as defined in 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.50.

(3) To the extent intergovernmental transfers are voluntarily made by, and accepted from, an eligible provider described in subsection (2) of this section, or a governmental entity affiliated with an eligible provider, the department shall make increased capitation payments to applicable medicaid managed care plans for covered ground emergency medical transportation services.

(a) The increased capitation payments made pursuant to this section must be in amounts at least actuarially equivalent to the supplemental fee-for-service payments available for eligible providers to the extent permissible under federal law.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all funds associated with intergovernmental transfers made and accepted pursuant to this section must be used to fund additional payments to eligible providers.

(c) Medicaid managed care plans shall pay one hundred percent of any amount of increased capitation payments made pursuant to this section to eligible providers for providing and making available ground emergency medical transportation and paramedical services pursuant to a contract or other arrangement with a medicaid managed care plan.

(4) The intergovernmental transfer program developed pursuant to this section must be implemented on the date federal approval was obtained, and only to the extent intergovernmental transfers from the eligible provider, or the governmental entity with which it is affiliated, are provided for this purpose. To the extent permitted by federal law, the department may implement the intergovernmental transfer program and increased capitation payments pursuant to this section on a retroactive basis as needed.

(5) Participation in the intergovernmental transfers under this section is voluntary on the part of the transferring entities for purposes of all applicable federal laws.

(6) This section must be implemented without any additional expenditure from the state general fund. As a condition of participation under this section, each eligible provider as described in subsection (2) of this section, or the governmental entity affiliated with an eligible provider, shall agree to reimburse the department for any costs associated with implementing this section. Intergovernmental transfers described in this section are subject to a twenty percent administration fee of the nonfederal share paid to the department and is allowed to count as a cost of providing the services.

(7) As a condition of participation under this section, medicaid managed care plans, eligible providers as described in subsection (2) of this section, and governmental entities affiliated with eligible providers shall agree to comply with any requests for information or similar data requirements imposed by the department for purposes of obtaining supporting documentation necessary to claim federal funds or to obtain federal approvals.

(8) This section must be implemented only if and to the extent federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized, and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(9) To the extent that the director determines that the payments made pursuant to this section do not comply with federal medicaid requirements, the director retains the discretion to return or not accept an intergovernmental transfer, and may adjust payments pursuant to this section as necessary to comply with federal medicaid requirements.

(10) To the extent federal approval is obtained, the increased capitation payments under this section may commence for dates of service on or after January 1, 2015.

[ 2015 c 147 s 2.]